New Jersey, session 221, A1061.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Legalized Games of Chance Control Commission shall adopt regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), authorizing licensees to hold and conduct Queen of Hearts raffle games.  The control commission may specify any requirement applicable to the conduct of Queen of Hearts raffle games that the control commission may deem necessary in accordance with this section. b.    A Queen of Hearts raffle means a raffle game utilizing a Queen of Hearts raffle board onto which 54 playing cards can be placed facedown, side-by-side, and held securely by a locking, transparent cover, which playing cards shall be thoroughly shuffled and from which the participant holding the winning raffle ticket drawn at random from a raffle ticket drum or receptacle shall be entitled to Search for the Queen of Hearts by selecting one of the facedown playing cards. When the playing card selected is not the Queen of Hearts, the card shall be placed out of play, and the holder of the winning raffle ticket selecting that card shall be immediately awarded a cash prize valued according to the schedule set forth in regulation by the Legalized Games of Chance Control Commission.  The raffle drawings shall be conducted weekly until a person selects the Queen of Hearts. When the playing card selected is the Queen of Hearts, the holder of the winning raffle ticket selecting that card shall be awarded 50 percent of the prize, with the remainder of the prize retained by the licensee as proceeds from conducting the raffle. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.